test/src/morphology/N-arshin_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - aršin: # Noun 234 'eng /est arssin/fin' - full paradigm
     aršin+N+Sg+Nom: aršin
     aršin+N+Sg+Gen: aršin
     aršin+N+Sg+Par: aršint
     aršin+N+Sg+Dat: aršinõn
     aršin+N+Sg+Ins: aršinõks
     aršin+N+Sg+Ill: aršinõ
     aršin+N+Sg+Ela: aršinõst
     aršin+N+Pl+Nom: aršind
     aršin+N+Pl+Gen: aršind
     aršin+N+Pl+Par: aršiņi
     aršin+N+Pl+Dat: aršindõn
     aršin+N+Pl+Ins: aršindõks
     aršin+N+Pl+Ill: aršiņiž
     aršin+N+Pl+Ela: aršiņist
